gc_lang/fr/dictionnaire/orthographe/FRANCAIS_5.aff
FLAG long
# s'entre-nuire [Pr]
SFX yX Y 30
SFX yX   nuire      nuire/s'                    nuire               po:infi
SFX yX   nuire      nuisant/s'                  nuire               po:ppre
SFX yX   nuire      nui                         nuire               po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX yX   nuire      nuit/s'                     nuire               po:ipre po:3sg
SFX yX   nuire      nuisons                     nuire               po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisez                      nuire               po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisent/s'                  nuire               po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisait/s'                  nuire               po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yX   nuire      nuisions                    nuire               po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisiez                     nuire               po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisaient/s'                nuire               po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisit/s'                   nuire               po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yX   nuire      nuisîmes                    nuire               po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisîtes                    nuire               po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisirent/s'                nuire               po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yX   nuire      nuira/s'                    nuire               po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yX   nuire      nuirons                     nuire               po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuirez                      nuire               po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuiront/s'                  nuire               po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yX   nuire      nuirait/s'                  nuire               po:cond po:3sg
SFX yX   nuire      nuirions                    nuire               po:cond po:1pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuiriez                     nuire               po:cond po:2pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuiraient/s'                nuire               po:cond po:3pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuise/s'                    nuire               po:spre po:3sg
SFX yX   nuire      nuisît/s'                   nuire               po:simp po:3sg
SFX yX   nuire      nuisissions                 nuire               po:simp po:1pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisissiez                  nuire               po:simp po:2pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisissent/s'               nuire               po:simp po:3pl
SFX yX   nuire      nuisons-nous                nuire               po:impe po:1pl ds:+pr
SFX yX   nuire      nuisez-vous                 nuire               po:impe po:2pl ds:+pr

# occire [T]
SFX yY Y 4
SFX yY   ccire      ccire/n'q'd'l'm't's'        occire              po:infi
SFX yY   ccire      ccis/L'D'Q'                 occire              po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX yY   ccire      ccise/L'D'Q'                occire              po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yY   ccire      ccises/D'Q'                 occire              po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl

# frire [I,T]
SFX yZ N 14
SFX yZ   rire       rire                        rire                po:infi
SFX yZ   rire       risant                      rire                po:ppre
SFX yZ   rire       rit                         rire                po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yZ   rire       rits                        rire                po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yZ   rire       rite                        rire                po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yZ   rire       rites                       rire                po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yZ   rire       ris                         rire                po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yZ   rire       rit                         rire                po:ipre po:3sg
SFX yZ   rire       rirai                       rire                po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yZ   rire       riras                       rire                po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yZ   rire       rira                        rire                po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yZ   rire       rirais                      rire                po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yZ   rire       rirait                      rire                po:cond po:3sg
SFX yZ   rire       ris                         rire                po:impe po:2sg

# Participes passés du 3e groupe #######################################################################################

# Participes passés variables
SFX q+ Y 36
SFX q+   enir       enu/L'D'Q'                  enir                po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+   enir       enus/D'Q'                   enir                po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+   enir       enue/L'D'Q'                 enir                po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+   enir       enues/D'Q'                  enir                po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+   tir        ti/L'D'Q'                   tir                 po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+   tir        tis/D'Q'                    tir                 po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+   tir        tie/L'D'Q'                  tir                 po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+   tir        ties/D'Q'                   tir                 po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+   courir     couru/L'D'Q'                courir              po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+   courir     courus/D'Q'                 courir              po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+   courir     courue/L'D'Q'               courir              po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+   courir     courues/D'Q'                courir              po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+   ivre       écu                         vivre               po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+   ivre       écus                        vivre               po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+   ivre       écue                        vivre               po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+   ivre       écues                       vivre               po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+   aire       u                           aire                po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+   aire       us                          aire                po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+   aire       ue                          aire                po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+   aire       ues                         aire                po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+   dre        du                          dre                 po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+   dre        dus                         dre                 po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+   dre        due                         dre                 po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+   dre        dues                        dre                 po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+   valoir     valu                        .valoir             po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+   valoir     valus                       .valoir             po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+   valoir     value                       .valoir             po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+   valoir     values                      .valoir             po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+   aître      u/L'D'Q'                    aître               po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg      di:M
SFX q+   aître      us/D'Q'                     aître               po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl      di:M
SFX q+   aître      ue/L'D'Q'                   aître               po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg      di:M
SFX q+   aître      ues/D'Q'                    aître               po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl      di:M
SFX q+   aitre      u/L'D'Q'                    aitre               po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg      di:R
SFX q+   aitre      us/D'Q'                     aitre               po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl      di:R
SFX q+   aitre      ue/L'D'Q'                   aitre               po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg      di:R
SFX q+   aitre      ues/D'Q'                    aitre               po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl      di:R

# Participes passés invariables
SFX q. Y 9
SFX q.   enir       enu/q'                      enir                po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   tir        ti/q'                       tir                 po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   courir     couru/q'                    courir              po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   ivre       écu                         vivre               po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   aire       u                           aire                po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   dre        du                          dre                 po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   valoir     valu/q'                     .valoir             po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   aître      u/q'                        aître               po:ppas is:epi is:inv     di:M
SFX q.   aitre      u/q'                        aitre               po:ppas is:epi is:inv     di:R

# FIN #################################################################################################################
